Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5059.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 609k. (1) A vendor of spirits; a vendor representative, salesperson, or broker that represents the vendor of spirits; or a third party that provides engraving services may do either of the following: (a) Engrave a bottle of spirits sold by a specially designated distributor before selling the bottle to a consumer. (b) Engrave a bottle of spirits purchased by a consumer from a specially designated distributor. Both of the following apply to this subdivision: (i) The vendor of spirits; a vendor representative, salesperson, or broker that represents the vendor of spirits; or a third party that provides engraving services may pick up from the specially designated distributor's licensed premises the bottle of spirits that has been purchased by the consumer from the specially designated distributor and return the bottle to the specially designated distributor's licensed premises after the engraving has been completed for the consumer to pick up. (ii) Possession by a retailer of an engraved bottle of spirits that has been returned to the licensed premises of the specially designated distributor that sold the bottle of spirits for the consumer to pick up subject to subparagraph (i) does not violate section 901. (2) A vendor of spirits; a vendor representative, salesperson, or broker that represents the vendor of spirits; or a third party that provides engraving services may engrave a bottle of spirits purchased by a consumer from the inventory of a specially designated distributor during a consumer sampling event conducted in compliance with section 1027 by a vendor of spirits that holds a consumer sampling event license, or a vendor representative, salesperson, or broker that represents the supplier. (3) A brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; a salesperson or broker that represents a brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; or a third party that provides engraving services may do either of the following: (a) Engrave a bottle of beer or wine sold by a specially designated merchant before selling the bottle to a consumer. (b) Engrave a bottle of beer or wine purchased by a consumer from a specially designated merchant subject to both of the following: (i) The brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; a salesperson or broker that represents a brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; or a third party that provides engraving services may pick up from the specially designated merchant's licensed premises the bottle of beer or wine that has been purchased by the consumer from the specially designated merchant and return the bottle to the specially designated merchant's licensed premises after the engraving has been completed for the consumer to pick up. (ii) Possession by a retailer of an engraved bottle of beer or wine that has been returned to the licensed premises of the specially designated merchant that sold the bottle of beer or wine for the consumer to pick up subject to subparagraph (i) does not violate section 901. (4) A brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; a salesperson or broker that represents a brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine; or a third party that provides engraving services may engrave a bottle of beer or wine purchased by a consumer from the inventory of a specially designated merchant during a beer and wine tasting event conducted in compliance with section 537 by a brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine that holds a beer and wine tasting permit, or salesperson or broker that represents the brewer, micro brewer, wine maker, small wine maker, outstate seller of beer, or outstate seller of wine.